Mississippi, session 2026, HB157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  In addition to the curriculum otherwise required by law or the State Board of Education to be taught in the public schools of this state, a comprehensive course in Mississippi History is required for all students in Grade 9.  The Mississippi History course must provide students with an examination of the history of the State of Mississippi from the age of discovery and colonization to the present, with particular emphasis on the significant political, social, economic and cultural issues of the nineteenth and twentieth centuries, which have impacted the diverse ethnic and racial populations of the state. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.